Hawaii statutes.
§712-1248 Promoting a detrimental drug in
the second degree. (1) A person commits the offense of promoting a
detrimental drug in the second degree if the person knowingly:

(a) Possesses fifty or more capsules or tablets
containing one or more of the Schedule V substances;

(b) Possesses one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances, of an aggregate weight of one- eighth ounce or more,
containing one or more of the Schedule V substances;

(c) Possesses one or more preparations, compounds,
mixtures, or substances, of an aggregate weight of one ounce or more,
containing any marijuana; or

(d) Distributes any marijuana or any Schedule V
substance in any amount.

(2) Promoting a detrimental drug in the second
degree is a misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 163, §6(j); am L
1989, c 384, §3]

Revision Note

In subsection (1)(a) and (b), "or" deleted pursuant
to §23G-15.

Case Notes

Where violation of misdemeanor offense under subsection
(1)(d) also constituted violation of felony offense under §712-1247(1)(h),
conviction of felony offense would have constituted violation of defendant's
due process and equal protection rights. 86 H. 48, 947 P.2d 360 (1997).

Since to sell and to barter do not include to prescribe,
§712-1248(1)(d) is not a lesser included offense of §712-1247(1)(h). 78 H. 488
(App.), 896 P.2d 944 (1995).

Where a Hawaii county ordinance made the enforcement of
marijuana laws the lowest enforcement priority in the county, the ordinance was
preempted by state laws governing the investigation and prosecution of alleged
violations of the Hawaii Penal Code concerning the adult personal use of
cannabis. 132 H. 511 (App.), 323 P.3d 155 (2014).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next